Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1656.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Improving Indoor Air for Seniors and Children Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"ASHRAE." The American Society of Heating, Refrigerating and Air-Conditioning Engineers."Contaminant." A biological, chemical, physical or radiological agent that pollutes or reduces the purity of indoor air, including particulate matter or agents identified by the Environmental Protection Agency or ASHRAE.12345678910111213141516171819 "HVAC." Heating, ventilation and air conditioning."Indoor air quality." The degree to which indoor air is free of excessive levels of contaminants injurious to human health."Qualified air filter upgrade." A certified installation or repair of air filters in compliance with ASHRAE Standard 241 and achieving MERV 13 or higher."Qualified HVAC upgrade." Installation or repair of HVAC systems meeting the same standards as above."Qualified indoor air quality assessment." An assessment meeting standards issued by ASHRAE and the Department of Health."Qualifying property." A commercial or public property primarily used to house, treat or educate seniors 65 years of age or older or children under 18 years of age, including schools, day cares, senior living facilities and nursing homes.Section 3. Legislative intent.The General Assembly finds and declares that improving indoor air quality in facilities serving seniors and children is critical to public health. It is the policy of this Commonwealth to promote safe indoor environments through scientifically grounded standards and equitable public investment.Section 4. Indoor air quality.(a) Tax credit.--A taxpayer shall be allowed a nonrefundable tax credit against the personal income tax or corporate net income tax for expenditures incurred in the taxable year related to indoor air quality improvements in qualifying properties.(b) Amount.--The tax credit shall equal the sum of:(1) For qualified indoor air quality assessments, $1 per square foot.(2) For qualified air filter upgrades, $5 per square foot.20250HB1656PN2015 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) For qualified HVAC upgrades, $50 per square foot.(c) Limitations.--The following limits shall not be exceeded:(1) Credits for qualified HVAC upgrades or qualified air filter upgrades shall not exceed 50% of total expenditures in the taxable year.(2) Credits for qualified indoor air quality assessments shall not exceed the amount actually paid.Section 5. Indoor air quality certification program.Within 365 days of the effective date of this section, the Department of Health shall establish a voluntary certification program to certify qualifying properties meeting or exceeding indoor air quality standards. Certifications shall be made publicly available.Section 6. Public education.The Department of Health shall disseminate information concerning:(1) Health effects of poor indoor air quality.(2) Locations and building types associated with risk.(3) Mitigation methods.(4) Technologies and remediation actions.(5) Protection of vulnerable subpopulations.Section 7. Public health surveillance and research.The Department of Health is authorized to:(1) Collect and analyze indoor air quality related health data.(2) Coordinate research on contaminants and health effects.(3) Collaborate with academic and national partners.(4) Obtain de-identified data for epidemiological study, 20250HB1656PN2015 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subject to applicable Federal and State privacy laws.Section 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1656PN2015 - 4 - 123